Missouri, session 2026, HB3053.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.024, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 578.024, to read as follows:
578.024. 1. A person commits the offense of keeping a dangerous dog if he or she
owns or possesses a dog that has:
(1) Bitten any person, domestic animal, or livestock without provocation on one
occasion; or
(2) Previously bitten a person [or], a domestic animal, or livestock without
provocation and that dog bites any person, domestic animal, or livestock on a subsequent
occasion.
2. The offense of keeping a dangerous dog is:
(1) An infraction under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section; or
(2) A class B misdemeanor under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section,
unless such attack:
[(1)] (a) Results in serious injury to any person or death of a domestic animal or
livestock, in which case, it is a class A misdemeanor under subdivision (2) of subsection 1
of this section; or
[(2)] (b) Results in serious injury to any person or death of a domestic animal or
livestock and any previous attack also resulted in serious injury to any person or death of a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3053 2
domestic animal or livestock, in which case, it is a class E felony under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section; or
[(3)] (c) Results in the death of any person, in which case, it is a class D felony under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section.
3. In addition to the penalty included in subsection 2 of this section, if any dog that
has previously bitten a person [or], a domestic animal, or livestock without provocation bites
any person, domestic animal, or livestock on a subsequent occasion or if a dog that has not
previously bitten a person, domestic animal, or livestockattacks and causes serious injury to
or the death of any human, domestic animal, or livestock, the dog shall be seized
immediately by an animal control authority or by the county sheriff. The dog shall be
impounded and held for ten business days after the owner or possessor is given written
notification and thereafter destroyed.
4. The owner or possessor of the dog that has been impounded may file a written
appeal to the circuit court to contest the impoundment and destruction of such dog. The
owner or possessor shall provide notice of the filing of the appeal to the animal control
authority or county sheriff who seized the dog. If the owner or possessor files such an appeal
and provides proper notice, the dog shall remain impounded and shall not be destroyed while
such appeal is pending and until the court issues an order for the destruction of the dog. The
court shall hold a disposition hearing within thirty days of the filing of the appeal to
determine whether such dog shall be humanely destroyed. The court may order the owner or
possessor of the dog to pay the costs associated with the animal's keeping and care during the
pending appeal.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 273.033 and 273.036, section 578.022
and this section to the contrary, if a dog attacks or bites a person who is engaged in or
attempting to engage in a criminal activity at the time of the attack, the owner or possessor is
not guilty of any crime specified under this section or section 273.036, and is not civilly liable
under this section or section 273.036, nor shall such dog be destroyed as provided in
subsection 3 of this section, nor shall such person engaged in or attempting to engage in a
criminal activity at the time of the attack be entitled to the defenses set forth in section
273.033. For purposes of this section "criminal activity" shall not include the act of trespass
upon private property under section 569.150 as long as the trespasser does not otherwise
engage in, attempt to engage in, or have intent to engage in other criminal activity nor shall it
include any trespass upon private property by a person under the age of twelve under section
569.140.
6. The court may order the owner or possessor of the dog to pay:
(1) Any medical bill of a person, a domestic animal, or livestock resulting from
being bitten by the dog; or

HB 3053 3
(2) The replacement cost of the domestic animal or livestock if such bite results
in the death of the domestic animal or livestock.
7. A person, property owner, or livestock owner may kill a dog that shows
aggression to the person or owner in any manner that puts the person or owner in fear
of his or her life, the life of others, or the life of a domestic animal or livestock.
✔